



R.H. Bluestein and Company Investment Managers and Advisors
















			RH Bluestein
		







 



Investment Managers and Advisors
Our company
R.H. Bluestein & Company is comprised of experienced professionals dedicated to the goal of achieving superior investment results by emphasizing both preservation of capital and long-term growth.



INQUIRIES:

R.H. Bluestein & Company  -  260 E. Brown Street, Suite 100 Birmingham, MI 48009  (248) 646-4000   inquiries@rhbco.com 
R.H. Bluestein & Company  -  712 Fifth Avenue, 8th Floor, New York, NY 10019  (212) 974-2200   inquiries@rhbco.com 






Our approach 
We allocate equity and fixed income securities in a fashion which reflects the specific needs of each client. 




CONSISTENCY

Paramount to our approach to managing financial assets is our enduring and unwavering commitment to wealth preservation through all market conditions. Our message to our clients is consistent in all environments and the trusted individuals delivering this message have remained largely the same for decades.

Read More
Read Less




DISCIPLINE

We abide by certain time-tested rules in the management of financial assets. This conservative approach has proven, time and again, to protect our clients' assets while, at the same time, providing rewarding long term investment results. 

Read More
Read Less




COMMITMENT

The firm is a family-owned business that works closely with multiple generations of special families. Our commitment to these families is tangible and our influence in their lives is long-lasting. Clients hire us because they sense we will protect them, and retain us because we do.

Read More
Read Less















Who We Are | R.H. Bluestein and Company Investment Managers and Advisors
















			RH Bluestein
		







 




who we are








Robert H. Bluestein
Learn More >







Jeffrey N. Bluestein
Learn More >







Michele M. Payment
Learn More >







Kevin LaPlena
Learn More >







Patrick A. Villani
Learn More >







Thomas T. Seitz
Learn More >







Ken Smith
Learn More >







Joe Zuccaro
Learn More >







Cena Larsen
Learn More >







Cyndi Herberholz
Learn More >







Pamela Saumier
Learn More >







Maral Mamassian
Learn More >







Janel Williams
Learn More >







Nathan Kogan
Learn More >







Dee Richardson
Learn More >







Kory R. Bachman
Learn More >







Randon Ziegler
Learn More >







Chip Hoisington
Learn More >







Delphine Connor
Learn More >







Laura Cohen
Learn More >







Wayne Wright
Learn More >







Salvatore Maiorana
Learn More >







Denise Haslam
Learn More >







Mary Stevens
Learn More >









X





Robert H. Bluestein
Robert H. Bluestein serves as President of the Company with primary responsibility for the administration and structure of each portfolio under management. Mr. Bluestein graduated with a B.S. in 1967 from Cornell University and an M.B.A. in 1969 from the University of Michigan.
Mr. Bluestein began his career in the securities industry in 1969. He joined Goldman, Sachs & Co. in 1977, where he served as Vice President and Regional Manager. In that position, his responsibilities included administration of the North Central Region for the various divisions of Goldman, Sachs & Co., as well as coverage of major investment portfolios for research and trade-related services.
Mr. Bluestein currently serves as a member of the Board of Trustees of the College for Creative Studies in Detroit, Michigan. He served as a national co-chair from 1990 through 1995 of the Cornell Fund Campaign for the School of Industrial and Labor Relations, was a recipient of Cornell’s Jerome Alpern Distinguished Alumni Award in 2000, and currently serves as a member of the ILR Alumni Advisory Board. He is a past member of the Board of Trustees of the Children’s Hospital of Michigan and The Children’s Center of Detroit.





Jeffrey N. Bluestein
Jeffrey N. Bluestein serves as Chief Compliance Officer and Managing Director of the Company. Mr. Bluestein graduated from Cornell University with a B.S. in Management from the School of Hotel Administration and from the Ross School of Business at the University of Michigan with an M.B.A. in Finance.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2004, Mr. Bluestein spent several years at Newman Financial Services, Inc., a boutique investment bank, where he served as Assistant Vice President. His responsibilities included credit analysis for a wide range of financial instruments, as well as fixed income securities and loan obligations. Mr. Bluestein’s additional past positions include Financial Analyst at Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Trading Clerk at The Griswold Company on the New York Stock Exchange. Mr. Bluestein served on the Alumni Board of Governors at the Ross School of Business and currently serves on the Board of Directors for CIVITAS in New York City.





Michele M. Payment
Michele M. Payment serves as Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. Ms. Payment graduated with honors from Michigan Technological University with a B.B.A. in Accounting, and with distinction from the Ross School of Business at the University of Michigan Business School with an M.B.A. in Finance and Accounting.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 1991, Ms. Payment served as Assistant Controller for a private company in Ann Arbor, Michigan. Previously, Ms. Payment was employed at Williams International as a Senior Accountant.





Kevin LaPlena
Kevin LaPlena serves as Senior Managing Director of the Company. Mr. LaPlena graduated from Wayne State University with a B.A. in Economics.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 1996, Mr. LaPlena served as Product Manager and Personal Trust Officer for the Private Banking Division of a major bank holding company.





Patrick A. Villani
Patrick A. Villani serves as Senior Vice President of the Company and is responsible for information technology. Mr. Villani graduated from Boston University with a B.A. in International Relations/Finance.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company full time in 1999, Mr. Villani was the founder and president of Villani & Associates, a computer consulting company, located in the Detroit area. In that capacity, Mr. Villani was responsible for designing the information systems and software deployment for R.H. Bluestein & Company.





Thomas T. Seitz
Thomas T. Seitz serves as Head Trader and Vice President of the Company. Mr. Seitz graduated from Texas Christian University with a B.A. in Art History.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2007, Mr. Sietz was a Senior Sales Trader at The Griswold Company on the New York Stock Exchange. Before joining the Griswold Company, Mr. Seitz was the Head Trader for PG&E – Energy Trading in Houston, Texas.
Mr. Seitz is an avid golfer and squash player. He is a past board member of the Apawamis Club in Rye, New York.





Ken Smith
Ken Smith serves as Senior Portfolio Analyst for the Company.  Mr. Smith graduated from the University of Michigan with a Bachelor of Business Administration degree and from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business with a Master of Business Administration degree.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2015, Mr. Smith served as a Senior Portfolio Manager for a local investment manager and has over 20 years investment experience. Mr. Smith is a CFA® charter-holder and a Certified Public Accountant.





Joe Zuccaro
Joe Zuccaro serves as Portfolio Analyst for the Company.  Mr. Zuccaro graduated from Grand Valley State University with a B.B.A. in Finance and Marketing.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2012, Mr. Zuccaro worked at a private equity investment firm.





Cena Larsen
Cena Larsen serves as analyst for the Company.  She graduated from the University of Michigan with a B.A. in History in 2013. Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein in 2014, she interned in London at Halcyon Days, Ltd., an established British brand with Royal warrants, and at Beringea, a venture capital firm.  She also worked after graduation for Anthropologie. She is an avid Michigan football fan and loves to travel.





Cyndi Herberholz
Cyndi Herberholz serves as Vice President and Head of Cashiering Services for the Company. Ms. Herberholz graduated from the University of Michigan with a B.A. in Psychology.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 1994, Ms. Herberholz served as Branch Manager of a major bank holding company in Grand Rapids, Michigan.





Pamela Saumier
Pamela Saumier serves as Vice President for the Company. Ms. Saumier graduated from Oakland University with a B.S. in Public Administration and Policy.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2000, Ms. Saumier served as Director of Stock Services for a private company.





Maral Mamassian
Maral Mamassian serves as Investment Associate for the Company. Ms. Mamassian graduated from Albion College with a B.A. in European History and Latin.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2008, Ms. Mamassian worked in film production. She was also President of Spontaneous Production, Ltd., a TV and film production company producing commercials, corporate image, direct marketing, and music videos.





Janel Williams
Janel Williams serves as Investment Associate and Assistant to Cashiering Services. Ms. Williams graduated from the University of Michigan-Dearborn with a B.A. in Finance.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2004, Ms. Williams served as a Stock Associate of an independent equity plan administration company in Birmingham, Michigan.





Nathan Kogan
Nathan Kogan serves as Assistant Controller of the Company.
Nate graduated from Wayne State University with a B.S/B.A. in Accounting and an MBA from Walsh College.
Nate joined R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2003.  He currently resides in Birmingham, MI with his wife and two children.





Dee Richardson
Denise Richardson serves as Investment Associate for the Company.  Ms. Richardson graduated from Oakland University and also received Certification in IT from Oakland University.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2004, Denise worked for McDonald Investments/Key Bank as an investment Associate for 11 years
 





Kory R. Bachman
Kory R. Bachman serves as Investment Associate for the Company.  Mr. Bachman graduated from Northwood University with a B.B.A. in Banking and Finance.  Mr. Bachman joined the company immediately following graduation.





Randon Ziegler
Randon Ziegler assists in Investment Operations managing much of the account reconciliations and client reporting.
He graduated from the University of Michigan, Dearborn with a BA in economics.
Prior to joining the Company in 1998, he was a lead mutual fund accountant for a large mid-western financial services firm.





Chip Hoisington
Chip Hoisington serves as an Investment Associate for the Company. Mr. Hoisington graduated from Walsh College of Accountancy and Business Administration with a BBA and MS in Finance, with distinction.
Prior to joining the firm, Mr. Hoisington was a long term employee of Munder Capital Management, a privately owned asset management firm in the Detroit, Michigan area. He left the firm as a Senior Equity Trader, trading domestic and international securities. Mr. Hoisington enjoys photography and golf while not in the office.





Delphine Connor
Delphine Connor serves as Administrative Assistant for the Company.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2000, Ms. Connor served as Administrative Assistant of Employee Relations at Bank One Corporation in Detroit, Michigan.





Laura Cohen
Laura Cohen serves as Investment Associate for the Company.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2011, Laura worked in Client Services for an Architecture firm in New York City.
Originally from England, Laura now resides in New York.





Wayne Wright
Wayne Wright serves as Investment Associate for the Company.  After serving in the Marine Corps, Wayne spent 36 years in the brokerage business before joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 1998.





Salvatore Maiorana
Salvatore J. Maiorana  Investment Associate. Mr. Maiorana graduated from Wayne State University with a B.S. in Finance and from Walsh College with a M.S. in Finance.  Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2012, Mr. Maiorana was a Vice President with
J.P. Morgan Asset Management.





Denise Haslam
Denise Haslam serves as Investment Associate for the Company.
Prior to joining R.H. Bluestein & Company in 2015, Ms. Haslam served as Sr. Proposal & Database Associate for an investment firm in Birmingham, Michigan.





Mary Stevens
Mary Stevens serves as Investment Associate for the Company.  Mary  has worked in investment finance for the past 25 years, starting at Comerica in 1990, in Corporate Trust & Trust Operations.
In 2007 Mary was selected to join Munder Capitol for her expertise in domestic and international settlements.
Mary joined RH Bluestein in 2015 as an investment associate bringing her 25 years of Operations experience in domestic and international settlements.















Huntington National Bank Has $19.49 Million Position in Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK) | Daily Political










































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















Rockwell Automation Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Rockwell Automation Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Church & Dwight Company, Inc. (CHD) Stake Boosted by Huntington National Bank					

Huntington National Bank Has $19.49 Million Position in Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK)					

Huntington National Bank Has $9.41 Million Stake in J.M. Smucker Company (The) (SJM)					

Huntington National Bank Decreases Stake in KLA-Tencor Corporation (NASDAQ:KLAC)					

Huntington National Bank Buys 95 Shares of Equinix, Inc. (EQIX)					

Huntington National Bank Sells 1,737 Shares of C.R. Bard, Inc. (NYSE:BCR)					

Bridges Investment Counsel Inc. Raises Position in Suncor Energy  Inc. (NYSE:SU)					

Bridges Investment Management Inc. Has $388,000 Stake in WEC Energy Group, Inc. (WEC)					

ING Group, N.V. (NYSE:ING) Shares Bought by Bridges Investment Counsel Inc.					

Bridges Investment Counsel Inc. Invests $243,000 in Marriott International (NASDAQ:MAR)					

Bridges Investment Counsel Inc. Acquires Shares of 7,212 American States Water Company (AWR)					

Bridges Investment Counsel Inc. Purchases 34,512 Shares of BP p.l.c. (BP)					

Magellan Midstream Partners L.P. (NYSE:MMP) Stake Maintained by Bridges Investment Management Inc.					

Private Bank & Trust Co. Purchases 2,632 Shares of Baidu, Inc. (BIDU)					

Bridges Investment Management Inc. Sells 110 Shares of Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP)					

Private Bank & Trust Co. Continues to Hold Stake in Western Union Company (The) (NYSE:WU)					

Diageo PLC (DEO) Stake Raised by Private Bank & Trust Co.					

CME Group Inc. (NASDAQ:CME) Position Increased by Private Bank & Trust Co.					

Cannabis Sativa Inc (OTCMKTS:CBDS) Insider Sells $50,646.63 in Stock					

Insider Buying: Johnson Matthey PLC (JMAT) Insider Buys 15 Shares of Stock					





 





						Huntington National Bank Has $19.49 Million Position in Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK)					

						 July 24th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Tyrone Williams 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










Huntington National Bank increased its stake in shares of  Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK) by 13.0% during the second quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 120,365 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after buying an additional 13,881 shares during the period. Huntington National Bank owned 0.09% of Rockwell Automation worth $19,494,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Several other large investors have also modified their holdings of the company. Jacobus Wealth Management Inc. acquired a new stake in shares of  Rockwell Automation during the first quarter valued at $104,000.  Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings Co. Ltd. increased its stake in shares of  Rockwell Automation by 1,700.0% in the first quarter. Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings Co. Ltd. now owns 720 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $112,000 after buying an additional 680 shares during the last quarter.  Appleton Group LLC acquired a new stake in shares of  Rockwell Automation during the first quarter valued at $213,000.  Hunter Associates Investment Management LLC acquired a new stake in shares of  Rockwell Automation during the first quarter valued at $215,000.  Finally, S&CO Inc. acquired a new stake in shares of  Rockwell Automation during the first quarter valued at $216,000. Hedge funds and other institutional investors own  73.50% of the company’s stock. 
Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK) traded down 0.55% on Monday, reaching $164.18. The company’s stock had a trading volume of 296,571 shares. Rockwell Automation, Inc. has a 52 week low of $111.52 and a 52 week high of $167.97. The firm has a market capitalization of $21.15 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 27.40 and a beta of 1.17. The company has a 50 day moving average of $162.60 and a 200 day moving average of $154.71. 




Rockwell Automation (NYSE:ROK) last posted its earnings results on Wednesday, April 26th. The industrial products company reported $1.55 EPS for the quarter, beating the consensus estimate of $1.40 by $0.15. The firm had revenue of $1.55 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.48 billion. Rockwell Automation had a return on equity of 39.71% and a net margin of 12.88%. Rockwell Automation’s revenue for the quarter was up 7.9% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the prior year, the company posted $1.37 earnings per share.  On average, analysts forecast that  Rockwell Automation, Inc. will post $6.66 earnings per share for the current year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, September 11th. Stockholders of record on Monday, August 14th will be paid a dividend of $0.76 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Thursday, August 10th. This represents a $3.04 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 1.84%. Rockwell Automation’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is 50.75%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: “Huntington National Bank Has $19.49 Million Position in Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK)” was  published by Daily Political and is the sole property of of Daily Political. If you are viewing this news story on another site, it was stolen and reposted in violation of United States & international trademark & copyright legislation. The original version of this news story can be read at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/24/huntington-national-bank-has-19-49-million-position-in-rockwell-automation-inc-nyserok.html. 
Several equities research analysts have recently weighed in on the company. Barclays PLC increased their price target on Rockwell Automation from $166.00 to $167.00 and gave the stock an “overweight” rating in a report on Wednesday, April 19th. Zacks Investment Research downgraded Rockwell Automation from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a report on Wednesday, July 12th. Gabelli upgraded Rockwell Automation from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a report on Wednesday, April 19th. Stifel Nicolaus increased their price target on Rockwell Automation from $159.00 to $167.00 and gave the stock a “hold” rating in a report on Friday, April 28th. Finally, Wolfe Research assumed coverage on Rockwell Automation in a report on Tuesday, July 11th. They issued a “peer perform” rating on the stock. One analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, twelve have given a hold rating and four have given a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $148.53.
In related news, Director William T. Jr/Wi Mccormick sold 432 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Monday, May 15th. The shares were sold at an average price of $158.07, for a total value of $68,286.24. Following the completion of the sale, the director now owns 9,109 shares in the company, valued at $1,439,859.63. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is available through the SEC website. Also, Director Betty C. Alewine sold 7,173 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, April 28th. The shares were sold at an average price of $158.52, for a total transaction of $1,137,063.96. Following the completion of the sale, the director now owns 20,584 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $3,262,975.68. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold 129,605 shares of company stock valued at $20,469,855 in the last quarter. Insiders own  1.65% of the company’s stock. 
About Rockwell Automation
Rockwell Automation, Inc (Rockwell Automation) is a provider of industrial automation power, control and information solutions for manufacturers. The Company operates through two segments: Architecture & Software and Control Products & Solutions. The Architecture & Software segment contains various hardware, software and communication components of the Company’s integrated control and information architecture capable of controlling the customer’s industrial processes and connecting with their manufacturing enterprise.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ROK? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK).






Receive News & Ratings for Rockwell Automation Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Rockwell Automation Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 
























































﻿





























Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP) Position Lowered by Nuveen Asset Management LLC - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Roper Technologies Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Roper Technologies Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP) Position Lowered by Nuveen Asset Management LLC
Needham & Company LLC Reiterates Buy Rating for Acacia Communications, Inc. (ACIA)
Stryker Corporation (NYSE:SYK) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research
Gabelli Initiates Coverage on Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (FMX)
Extra Space Storage Inc (NYSE:EXR) Downgraded by Bank of America Corporation
Fitbit, Inc. (NYSE:FIT) Upgraded at Vetr Inc.
Canon (CAJ) vs. FEI (NASDAQ:FEIC) Head-To-Head Survey
Head-To-Head Comparison: The Medicines (MDCO) & Merus Labs International (NASDAQ:MSLI)
Auxilio (NASDAQ:AUXO) versus LSC Communications (LKSD) Head-To-Head Review
Chemical Financial Corporation (NASDAQ:CHFC) Stake Decreased by Nuveen Asset Management LLC
Celsius Holdings (NASDAQ:CELH) Receiving Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Analysis Finds
Prothena Corporation PLC (NASDAQ:PRTA) Shares Sold by Nuveen Asset Management LLC
TIAA CREF Investment Management LLC Has $8.07 Million Stake in SkyWest, Inc. (SKYW)
Glenmede Trust Co. NA Maintains Stake in Versum Materials Inc. (NYSE:VSM)
Glenmede Trust Co. NA Continues to Hold Position in AMERISAFE, Inc. (NASDAQ:AMSF)
Glenmede Trust Co. NA Continues to Hold Position in Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS)
Rock Point Advisors LLC Has $8.36 Million Position in D/B/A Chubb Limited New (NYSE:CB)
Jane Street Group LLC Lowers Position in ServisFirst Bancshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:SFBS)
Vodafone Group PLC (NASDAQ:VOD) Position Maintained by Glenmede Trust Co. NA
Principal Financial Group Inc. Acquires 10,374 Shares of Synchronoss Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:SNCR)







Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP) Position Lowered by Nuveen Asset Management LLC


					Posted by Chloe McGuire on Jul 20th, 2017 // No Comments




Nuveen Asset Management LLC cut its stake in shares of  Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) by 73.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor  owned 6,403 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after selling 17,296 shares during the period. Nuveen Asset Management LLC’s holdings in Roper Technologies were worth $1,322,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Several other large investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. Quadrature Capital Ltd purchased a new stake in shares of  Roper Technologies during the fourth quarter valued at $4,950,000.  Teachers Advisors LLC increased its position in  Roper Technologies by 50.8% in the fourth quarter. Teachers Advisors LLC now owns 342,533 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $62,711,000 after buying an additional 115,326 shares in the last quarter.  Kentucky Retirement Systems bought a new position in  Roper Technologies during the fourth quarter valued at approximately $1,347,000.  Kentucky Retirement Systems Insurance Trust Fund bought a new position in  Roper Technologies during the fourth quarter valued at approximately $601,000.  Finally, Highbridge Capital Management LLC bought a new position in  Roper Technologies during the fourth quarter valued at approximately $1,227,000. 96.71% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Roper Technologies Inc. alerts:



Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP) opened at 236.06 on Thursday. The firm’s 50-day moving average is $232.09 and its 200 day moving average is $213.13. The company has a market capitalization of $24.09 billion, a PE ratio of 36.43 and a beta of 1.05. Roper Technologies, Inc. has a one year low of $159.28 and a one year high of $238.49. 





Roper Technologies (NYSE:ROP) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Friday, April 28th. The industrial products company reported $2.11 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $1.99 by $0.12. The company had revenue of $1.09 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.09 billion. Roper Technologies had a net margin of 16.74% and a return on equity of 12.81%. The business’s revenue for the quarter was up 20.4% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the prior year, the firm earned $1.81 earnings per share.  On average, equities analysts expect that  Roper Technologies, Inc. will post $9.21 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
The firm also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Friday, July 21st. Shareholders of record on Friday, July 7th will be paid a dividend of $0.35 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 5th. This represents a $1.40 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 0.59%. Roper Technologies’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 21.60%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: “Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP) Position Lowered by Nuveen Asset Management LLC” was originally  published by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this news story on another publication, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of international trademark & copyright law. The correct version of this news story can be read at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/20/roper-technologies-inc-rop-position-lowered-by-nuveen-asset-management-llc.html. 
ROP has been the topic of several recent analyst reports. J P Morgan Chase & Co downgraded shares of Roper Technologies from an “overweight” rating to a “neutral” rating and set a $219.00 price target on the stock. in a research note on Friday, March 24th. Royal Bank Of Canada  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and issued a $245.00 price target on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Tuesday, April 11th. Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Roper Technologies from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Monday. Raymond James Financial, Inc. raised their price target on shares of Roper Technologies from $253.00 to $268.00 in a research note on Wednesday, July 5th. Finally, Cowen and Company  reaffirmed an “outperform” rating and issued a $250.00 price target (up previously from $220.00) on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Monday, April 17th. Three analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating, eight have assigned  a buy rating and one  has assigned  a strong buy rating to the stock. The stock presently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $232.09.
In other Roper Technologies news, Director Christopher Wright sold 1,800 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, June 9th. The shares were sold at an average price of $228.70, for a total transaction of $411,660.00. Following the sale, the director now directly owns 66,104 shares in the company, valued at $15,117,984.80. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through the SEC website. 2.50% of the stock is owned by corporate insiders. 
Roper Technologies Company Profile

Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ROP? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP).







Receive News & Ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 


















































Fisher Asset Management LLC Has $2,430,000 Stake in iRobot Corporation (IRBT) | Daily Political











































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















iRobot Corporation - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for iRobot Corporation with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Mallinckrodt PLC (NYSE:MNK) Stake Decreased by Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX					

NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. Buys 2,694 Shares of Xerox Corporation (NYSE:XRX)					

Meeder Asset Management Inc. Lowers Position in Motorola Solutions, Inc. (MSI)					

Anadarko Petroleum Corporation (APC) Position Held by Chesley Taft & Associates LLC					

Bank of Montreal Can Acquires 399,087 Shares of Louisiana-Pacific Corporation (LPX)					

Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX Sells 4,371 Shares of Discovery Communications, Inc. (DISCA)					

Regal Beloit Corporation (NYSE:RBC) Position Decreased by Bank of Montreal Can					

Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. Sells 140 Shares of Stericycle, Inc. (NASDAQ:SRCL)					

Meeder Asset Management Inc. Buys 654 Shares of Cirrus Logic, Inc. (NASDAQ:CRUS)					

Aramark (ARMK) Shares Sold by Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc.					

6,526 Shares in Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI) Acquired by Meeder Asset Management Inc.					

Gateway Investment Advisers LLC Holds Position in Navient Corporation (NAVI)					

Senior Housing Properties Trust (NYSE:SNH) Stake Cut by Fisher Asset Management LLC					

Alibaba Group Holding Limited (NYSE:BABA) Shares Sold by Vontobel Asset Management Inc.					

Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX Has $325,000 Position in News Corporation (NASDAQ:NWS)					

Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. Has $6.35 Million Position in Mattel, Inc. (NASDAQ:MAT)					

Meeder Asset Management Inc. Boosts Stake in Arrow Electronics, Inc. (ARW)					

Gateway Investment Advisers LLC Holds Position in CNO Financial Group, Inc. (CNO)					

Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. Increases Stake in Netflix, Inc. (NASDAQ:NFLX)					

Fisher Asset Management LLC Has $2,430,000 Stake in iRobot Corporation (IRBT)					





 





						Fisher Asset Management LLC Has $2,430,000 Stake in iRobot Corporation (IRBT)					

						 July 23rd, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Patrick Bannon 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










Fisher Asset Management LLC held its position in  iRobot Corporation (NASDAQ:IRBT) during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor  owned 28,883 shares of the industrial products company’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Fisher Asset Management LLC owned about 0.11% of iRobot Corporation worth $2,430,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
A number of other institutional investors also recently added to or reduced their stakes in IRBT. State of Alaska Department of Revenue increased its position in shares of  iRobot Corporation by 2.4% in the first quarter. State of Alaska Department of Revenue now owns 3,010 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $199,000 after buying an additional 70 shares during the last quarter.  Capital One National Association increased its position in shares of  iRobot Corporation by 1.0% in the first quarter. Capital One National Association now owns 7,188 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $475,000 after buying an additional 74 shares during the last quarter.  NEXT Financial Group Inc increased its position in shares of  iRobot Corporation by 6.2% in the second quarter. NEXT Financial Group Inc now owns 1,890 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $159,000 after buying an additional 110 shares during the last quarter.  United Capital Financial Advisers LLC increased its position in shares of  iRobot Corporation by 1.1% in the first quarter. United Capital Financial Advisers LLC now owns 11,745 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $777,000 after buying an additional 125 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Creative Planning increased its position in shares of  iRobot Corporation by 14.0% in the second quarter. Creative Planning now owns 1,317 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $111,000 after buying an additional 162 shares during the last quarter. Institutional investors own  87.37% of the company’s stock. 
Shares of iRobot Corporation (NASDAQ IRBT) opened at 88.47 on Friday. iRobot Corporation has a 52 week low of $36.17 and a 52 week high of $104.61. The company has a market capitalization of $2.43 billion, a PE ratio of 45.49 and a beta of 1.13. The firm’s 50-day moving average price is $92.11 and its 200 day moving average price is $73.86. 




iRobot Corporation (NASDAQ:IRBT) last released its quarterly earnings data on Tuesday, April 25th. The industrial products company reported $0.52 EPS for the quarter, beating the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $0.26 by $0.26. The company had revenue of $168.47 million during the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $155.86 million. iRobot Corporation had a net margin of 7.79% and a return on equity of 14.03%. iRobot Corporation’s quarterly revenue was up 28.8% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the prior year, the firm earned $0.13 EPS.  Equities analysts predict that  iRobot Corporation will post $1.67 EPS for the current year. 
WARNING: This article was first  published by Daily Political and is the property of of Daily Political. If you are accessing this article on another website, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of U.S. and international trademark & copyright legislation. The correct version of this article can be viewed at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/23/fisher-asset-management-llc-has-2430000-stake-in-irobot-corporation-irbt.html. 
Several equities analysts have recently commented on the company. BidaskClub downgraded iRobot Corporation from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 5th. Dougherty & Co downgraded iRobot Corporation from a “buy” rating to a “neutral” rating in a research report on Monday, July 3rd. Zacks Investment Research cut iRobot Corporation from a “strong-buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a report on Tuesday, June 27th. Canaccord Genuity cut iRobot Corporation from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating and set a $90.00 target price on the stock. in a report on Wednesday, May 31st. They noted that the move was a valuation call. Finally, Needham & Company LLC  reaffirmed a “hold” rating on shares of iRobot Corporation in a report on Saturday, April 22nd. One equities research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, five have assigned  a hold rating and two have given a buy rating to the company. iRobot Corporation presently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $65.71.
In other news, COO Christian Cerda sold 75,121 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 9th. The shares were sold at an average price of $100.06, for a total transaction of $7,516,607.26. Following the completion of the sale, the chief operating officer now owns 98,300 shares in the company, valued at approximately $9,835,898. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through this link. Also, EVP Glen Daniel Weinstein sold 10,462 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, May 30th. The stock was sold at an average price of $98.61, for a total transaction of $1,031,657.82. Following the sale, the executive vice president now owns 75,308 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $7,426,121.88. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last quarter, insiders sold 108,886 shares of company stock valued at $10,525,541. 5.53% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
About iRobot Corporation
iRobot Corporation is a consumer robot company, which is engaged in designing and building robots. The Company’s portfolio of solutions features various technologies for the connected home and various concepts in mapping, navigation, mobility and artificial intelligence. The Company sells various products that are designed for use at home.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding IRBT? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for iRobot Corporation (NASDAQ:IRBT).






Receive News & Ratings for iRobot Corporation Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for iRobot Corporation and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 


























































R H Bluestein and Company                                                                                                - Birmingham                                        , MI         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



MI



Birmingham



Investment Advice



Investment Advisory Service



                            R H Bluestein and Company
                                    



 





















R 


R H Bluestein and Company                                                                                               
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



260 E BROWN ST STE 100 BIRMINGHAM, MI 48009
Get Directions



(248) 646-4000
www.rhbco.com                                                                                           





Business Info



 Founded 1990
 Incorporated MI
 Annual Revenue $4,262,382.00
 Employee Count 20
 Industries Investment Advisory Service
 Contacts Robert H Bluestein                                                                                                      







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


R H Bluestein And Company                                                                                                was founded in 1990, and is located at 260 E Brown St Ste 100 in Birmingham. Additional information is available at www.rhbco.com                                                                                            or by contacting Robert H Bluestein                                                                                                       at (248) 646-4000. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







R

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Xylem (NYSE:XYL) Stock Price, News & Analysis | MarketBeat






















    























































































Xylem Company Profile (NYSE:XYL)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Xylem (NYSE:XYL)
Xylem Inc. is a water technology company. The Company designs, manufactures and services engineered solutions across a range of critical applications. It is an equipment and service provider for water and wastewater applications with a portfolio of products and services addressing the cycle of water, from collection, distribution and use to the return of water to the environment. It has three business segments, which include Water Infrastructure, Applied Water and Sensus. Water Infrastructure focuses on the transportation, treatment and testing of water, offering a range of products, including water and wastewater pumps, and controls and systems. Applied Water serves the uses of water and focuses on the residential, commercial, industrial and agricultural markets. The Sensus segment's products include metering, networked communications, measurement and control technologies, software and services, including cloud-based analytics, remote monitoring and data management. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Industrial Products
Industry: Pump & Pumping Equipment
Sub-Industry: Industrial Machinery
Symbol: NYSE:XYL
CUSIP: 98419M10
Web: www.xyleminc.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $10.37323 billionOutstanding Shares: 179,716,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $54.83200 Day Moving Avg: $51.0352 Week Range: $45.60 - $58.22


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 41.23Foreward P/E Ratio: 21.51P/E Growth: 1.79Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $4 billionPrice / Sales: 2.57Book Value: $12.53 per sharePrice / Book: 4.57Dividend:Annual Dividend: $0.72Dividend Yield: 1.3%


Profitability:EBIDTA: $665 millionNet Margins: 6.75%Return on Equity: 15.53%Return on Assets: 6.14%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 0.94%Current Ratio: 1.56%Quick Ratio: 1.11%Misc:Average Volume: 1.25 million shs.Beta: 1.18Short Ratio: 5.06

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)
What is Xylem's stock symbol?

Xylem trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "XYL."



How often does Xylem pay dividends? What is the dividend yield for Xylem?

Xylem announced a quarterly dividend on Thursday, May 11th. Investors of record on Thursday, May 25th will be paid a dividend of $0.18 per share on Wednesday, June 21st. This represents a $0.72 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 1.26%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Tuesday, May 23rd.  View Xylem's Dividend History.



How were Xylem's earnings last quarter?

Xylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) announced its earnings results on Tuesday, May, 2nd. The company reported $0.39 EPS for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters' consensus estimate of $0.38 by $0.01. The business had revenue of $1.07 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $1.05 billion. Xylem had a return on equity of 15.53% and a net margin of 6.75%. The company's revenue was up 26.4% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the prior year, the business earned $0.35 earnings per share.  View Xylem's Earnings History.



When will Xylem make its next earnings announcement?

Xylem is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Tuesday, August, 1st 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Xylem.



What guidance has Xylem issued on next quarter's earnings?

Xylem updated its FY17 earnings guidance on Tuesday, May, 2nd. The company provided earnings per share guidance of $2.23-$2.38 for the period, compared to the Thomson Reuters consensus earnings per share estimate of $2.29. The company issued revenue guidance of $4.50-$4.60 billion, compared to the consensus revenue estimate of $4.56 billion.



Where is Xylem's stock going? Where will Xylem's stock price be in 2017?

14 analysts have issued 12-month target prices for Xylem's shares. Their forecasts range from $50.00 to $60.00. On average, they expect Xylem's share price to reach $56.42 in the next year. View Analyst Ratings for Xylem.



What are analysts saying about Xylem stock?

Here are some recent quotes from research analysts about Xylem stock: 
1. According to Zacks Investment Research, "Over the last three months, Xylem's shares outperformed the Zacks categorized Machinery-General Industrial industry. Robust demand, greater innovation, increased end-market exposure and higher infrastructure spending of the government authorities in emerging countries (like India) are expected to bolster the company's revenues in the quarters ahead. In addition, solid top-line performances, greater productivity and increased cost discipline are likely to boost the company's profitability moving ahead. Notably, the company's strategic business buyouts are also anticipated to help in strengthening results in the quarters ahead. Over the last 60 days, the Zacks Consensus Estimate for the stock moved north for both 2017 and 2018, highlighting positive sentiments." (7/4/2017)
2. Cowen and Company analysts commented, "The April 4 Investor Day is likely an opportunity to dig in to Sensus cost/revenue synergies and recent discussions with customers on a truly unique total offering. We believe FY17/18 consensus is achievable despite some market concern that has affected the stock recently. Medium-term margin upside as Sensus is integrated and core business efficiency work continues. New $60 PT (up from $56)." (3/24/2017)




Who are some of Xylem's key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Xylem include Sandvik AB (SDVKY), Tenaris S.A. (TS), Ball Corporation (BLL), Toray Industries (TRYIY), Cintas Corporation (CTAS), Norsk Hydro ASA (NHYDY), Dover Corporation (DOV), Pentair PLC. (PNR), Packaging Corporation of America (PKG), Fortune Brands Home & Security (FBHS), W.W. Grainger (GWW), Smith (A.O.) Corporation (AOS), AB SKF (SKFRY), Sealed Air Corporation (SEE), IDEX Corporation (IEX), Avery Dennison Corporation (AVY), Crown Holdings (CCK) and Allegion PLC (ALLE).



Who are Xylem's key executives?

Xylem's management team includes the folowing people: Markos I. Tambakeras I, Independent Chairman of the BoardPatrick K. Decker, President, Chief Executive Officer, DirectorE. Mark Rajkowski, Chief Financial Officer, Senior Vice PresidentKairus K. Tarapore, Chief Human Resource Officer, Senior Vice PresidentClaudia S. Toussaint, Senior Vice President, General Counsel, Corporate SecretaryD. Randall Bays, Senior Vice President and President - SensusTomas Brannemo, Senior Vice President and President - TransportDavid Flinton, Senior Vice President, President - DewateringPak Steven Leung, Senior Vice President and President - Emerging MarketsKenneth Napolitano, Senior Vice President, President - Applied Water Systems



Who owns Xylem stock?

Xylem's stock is owned by a number of of retail and institutional investors. Top institutional investors include PGGM Investments (0.41%), AMF Pensionsforsakring AB (0.40%), Bank of Montreal Can (0.36%), Handelsbanken Fonder AB (0.35%), Russell Investments Group Ltd. (0.27%) and Mountain Pacific Investment Advisers Inc. ID (0.24%). Company insiders that own Xylem stock include Claudia S Toussaint, Colin R Sabol, Kenneth Napolitano, Markos I Tambakeras, Steven R Loranger and Tomas Brannemo. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Xylem.



Who sold Xylem stock? Who is selling Xylem stock?

Xylem's stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Russell Investments Group Ltd., Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund, Handelsinvest Investeringsforvaltning, Private Asset Management Inc., Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX, Forsta AP Fonden, Xact Kapitalforvaltning AB and Murphy Capital Management Inc.. Company insiders that have sold Xylem stock in the last year include Claudia S Toussaint, Colin R Sabol, Steven R Loranger and Tomas Brannemo. View Insider Buying and Selling for Xylem.



Who bought Xylem stock? Who is buying Xylem stock?

Xylem's stock was purchased by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Bank of Montreal Can, DAVENPORT & Co LLC, Handelsbanken Fonder AB, NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V., Mitsubishi UFJ Asset Management UK Ltd., Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc., Sprott Inc. and Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V..  View Insider Buying and Selling for Xylem.



How do I buy Xylem stock? 

Shares of Xylem can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Xylem's stock price today?

One share of Xylem stock can currently be purchased for approximately $57.21.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Xylem (NYSE XYL)Community Ranking:  2.3 out of 5 ( )Outperform Votes:  217 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  250 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  467MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Xylem and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Xylem (NYSE:XYL) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 4 Hold Ratings, 10 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Buy (Score: 2.71)Consensus Price Target: $56.42 (1.39% downside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/14/2017Stifel NicolausReiterated RatingHold$60.00Medium7/12/2017Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.Boost Price TargetOutperform$58.00 -> $60.00Low6/21/2017BMO Capital MarketsInitiated CoverageOutperform$60.00Low6/7/2017Boenning ScattergoodReiterated RatingBuy$55.00High5/15/2017Barclays PLCUpgradeEqual Weight -> Overweight$51.00 -> $59.00High5/10/2017CIBCReiterated RatingBuyLow3/24/2017Cowen and CompanyBoost Price TargetOutperform$56.00 -> $60.00Low3/12/2017Royal Bank Of CanadaReiterated RatingBuy$57.00Low3/8/2017Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)Initiated CoverageNeutral -> Neutral$52.00High2/8/2017Canaccord GenuityReiterated RatingHold$50.00N/A2/1/2017GabelliDowngradeBuy -> HoldN/A11/17/2016Northcoast ResearchInitiated CoverageBuyN/A11/2/2016Janney Montgomery ScottUpgradeNeutral -> Buy$50.00 -> $52.00N/A8/22/2016Atlantic SecuritiesUpgradeNeutral -> Overweight$54.00N/A5/4/2016WedbushBoost Price TargetNeutral$41.00 -> $43.00N/A4/5/2016Sterne Agee CRTUpgradeNeutral -> BuyN/A4/1/2016Robert W. BairdReiterated RatingHoldN/A2/5/2016DA DavidsonBoost Price TargetNeutral$38.00N/A1/21/2016Susquehanna Bancshares IncLower Price Target$38.00 -> $37.00N/A1/21/2016Seaport Global SecuritiesUpgradeAccumulate -> Buy$40.00N/A(Data available from 7/26/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Earnings History by Quarter for Xylem (NYSE XYL)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails8/1/2017$0.57N/A5/2/2017Q1 2017$0.38$0.39$1.05 billion$1.07 billionViewListen2/2/2017Q416$0.65$0.66$1.13 billion$1.10 billionViewListen11/1/2016Q316$0.53$0.54$913.53 million$897.00 millionViewListen8/2/2016Q216$0.47$0.48$927.69 million$932.00 millionViewListen5/3/2016Q116$0.34$0.35$832.03 million$847.00 millionViewListen2/4/2016Q415$0.60$0.60$997.15 million$994.00 millionViewListen10/29/2015Q315$0.48$0.49$897.80 million$902.00 millionViewListen7/30/2015Q215$0.43$0.43$924.98 million$920.00 millionViewListen4/30/2015Q115$0.31$0.33$840.60 million$837.00 millionViewListen2/5/2015Q414$0.61$0.62$1.03 billion$1.04 billionViewListen10/28/2014Q3$0.52$0.53$982.10 million$963.00 millionViewListen7/29/2014Q214$0.46$0.48$994.85 million$1.01 billionViewListen4/29/2014Q114$0.32$0.34$888.90 million$906.00 millionViewListen2/4/2014Q413$0.36$0.56$920.07 million$1.03 billionViewListen10/29/2013Q313$0.36$0.49$918.70 million$965.00 millionViewListen7/30/2013Q2 2013$0.44$0.36$967.90 million$960.00 millionViewListen4/30/2013Q1 2013$0.28$0.27$893.56 million$879.00 millionViewListen2/7/2013Q4 2012$0.46$0.47$980.57 million$969.00 millionViewListen11/1/2012Q312$0.43$0.44$924.00 million$931.00 millionViewN/A8/2/2012$0.49$0.49ViewN/A5/3/2012$0.37$0.36ViewN/A2/28/2012$0.45$0.40ViewN/A11/21/2011$0.43$0.55ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $2.312018 EPS Consensus Estimate: $2.66QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20175$0.36$0.44$0.39Q2 20175$0.52$0.58$0.56Q3 20175$0.57$0.62$0.61Q4 20175$0.71$0.78$0.75Q1 20183$0.47$0.52$0.50Q2 20183$0.64$0.68$0.66Q3 20183$0.66$0.70$0.68Q4 20183$0.80$0.83$0.82(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Most Recent Dividend:6/21/2017Annual Dividend:$0.72Dividend Yield:1.26%Dividend Growth:-0.10% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:50.35% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  31.03% (Based on This Year's Estimates)27.07% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Track Record:4 Years of Consecutive Dividend GrowthDividend History by Quarter for Xylem (NYSE XYL)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date5/11/2017quarterly$0.181.41%5/23/20175/25/20176/21/20172/2/2017quarterly$0.181.48%2/14/20172/16/20173/15/201710/13/2016quarterly$0.151.25%11/7/201611/9/201612/7/20168/17/2016quarterly$0.151.23%8/29/20168/31/20169/21/20165/12/2016quarterly$0.151.44%5/23/20165/25/20166/22/20162/5/2016quarterly$0.151.69%2/16/20162/18/20163/16/201610/14/2015quarterly$0.141.62%11/2/201511/4/201512/2/20158/19/2015quarterly$0.141.72%8/31/20159/2/20159/23/20155/13/2015quarterly$0.141.52%5/26/20155/28/20156/24/20152/5/2015quarterly$0.141.6%2/13/20152/18/20153/18/201510/15/2014quarterly$0.131.5%10/27/201410/29/201412/3/20148/25/2014quarterly$0.131.36%9/8/20149/10/20149/24/20145/7/2014quarterly$0.131.37%5/19/20145/21/20146/18/20142/4/2014quarterly$0.131.44%2/14/20142/19/20143/19/201410/10/2013quarterly$0.121.66%10/21/201310/23/201312/11/20138/21/2013quarterly$0.121.91%8/30/20139/4/20139/18/20135/8/2013quarterly$0.121.67%5/20/20135/22/20136/19/20132/7/2013quarterly$0.121.72%2/15/20132/20/20133/20/2013(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Insider Ownership Percentage: 0.75%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 85.91%Insider Trades by Quarter for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails6/29/2017Steven R LorangerDirectorSell66,132$55.01$3,637,921.32  5/4/2017Tomas BrannemoInsiderSell14,080$50.36$709,068.80  2/28/2017Tomas BrannemoInsiderSell819$48.46$39,688.74  11/4/2016Claudia S ToussaintSVPSell5,300$47.27$250,531.00  9/8/2016Colin R SabolInsiderSell27,473$50.91$1,398,650.43  8/17/2016Tomas BrannemoInsiderSell8,524$50.06$426,711.44  8/11/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell33,887$48.11$1,630,303.57  7/28/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell32,246$48.01$1,548,130.46  6/1/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell50,000$44.52$2,226,000.00  5/27/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell50,000$44.67$2,233,500.00  5/12/2016Colin R SabolSVPSell39,265$42.91$1,684,861.15  5/5/2016Kenneth NapolitanoSVPSell10,246$41.58$426,028.68  3/9/2016Tomas BrannemoSVPSell7,964$38.03$302,870.92  11/12/2015Markos I. TambakerasDirectorSell2,025$36.73$74,378.25  11/5/2015Steven R. LorangerDirectorSell165,690$36.69$6,079,166.10  5/29/2015Colin R SabolSVPSell20,712$36.57$757,437.84  5/4/2015Michael T SpeetzenCFOSell18,000$36.82$662,760.00  3/13/2015Colin R SabolSVPSell20,000$34.61$692,200.00  3/9/2015Robyn T MingleSVPSell27,105$35.34$957,890.70  3/3/2015Kenneth NapolitanoSVPSell9,859$36.13$356,205.67  3/2/2015Markos I TambakerasDirectorSell2,454$36.16$88,736.64  11/25/2014Surya N MohapatraDirectorSell3,640$38.24$139,193.60  11/20/2014Robyn T MingleSVPSell24,298$37.41$908,988.18  11/12/2014Steven R LorangerDirectorSell100,000$37.51$3,751,000.00  3/7/2014Colin SabolSVPSell29,835$38.47$1,147,752.45  2/21/2014Michael SpeetzenCFOSell61,326$38.87$2,383,741.62  2/19/2014Curtis CrawfordDirectorSell5,660$38.53$218,079.80  2/19/2014John ConnollyCAOSell8,186$37.62$307,957.32  2/11/2014Markos TambakerasDirectorSell2,373$37.23$88,346.79  2/7/2014Kenneth NapolitanoSVPSell28,846$36.79$1,061,244.34  2/6/2014Angela BuonocoreSVPSell11,996$36.00$431,856.00  1/15/2014Steven LorangerCEOSell89,235$36.08$3,219,598.80  9/13/2013Curtis CrawfordDirectorSell2,480$26.95$66,836.00  7/9/2013Colin R SabolSVPSell10,981$28.67$314,825.27  9/14/2012Steven R LorangerDirectorSell72,300$25.45$1,840,035.00  9/12/2012Steven R LorangerDirectorSell48,300$25.18$1,216,194.00  8/21/2012Edward J LudwigDirectorBuy1,000$25.60$25,600.00  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)


Latest Headlines for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Scheduled to Post Quarterly Earnings on Tuesdaywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 25 at 7:28 AM Analysts Anticipate Xylem Inc. (XYL) Will Announce Earnings of $0.57 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - July 24 at 9:51 AMSwell Investing: Building A Portfolio Of Companies Make The World A Better Placewww.nasdaq.com - July 19 at 9:44 AMXylem Inc. Forecasted to Post Q2 2017 Earnings of $0.57 Per Share (NYSE:XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 17 at 7:00 AMXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Receives "Hold" Rating from Stifel Nicolauswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 15 at 12:28 PMBrokers Offer Predictions for Xylem Inc.'s Q3 2017 Earnings (NYSE:XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 10:18 AMXylem to release second quarter 2017 financial results on August 1, 2017 - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - July 13 at 3:29 PMXylem to release second quarter 2017 financial results on August 1, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 11:29 AMWater Equipment And Services Stock Swimming At Top Of Buy Rangefinance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 11:29 AMOppenheimer Holdings, Inc. Boosts Xylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Price Target to $60.00www.americanbankingnews.com - July 12 at 2:25 PMStifel Nicolaus Reiterates "Hold" Rating for Xylem Inc (NYSE:XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 6 at 9:36 PMXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Receives Consensus Recommendation of "Buy" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 4 at 2:39 PMZacks Investment Research Upgrades Xylem Inc. (XYL) to Buywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 4 at 2:20 PMXylem (XYL) Hits a New 52-Week High: What's Driving It? - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 3 at 3:17 PMXylem (XYL) Hits a New 52-Week High: What's Driving It?finance.yahoo.com - July 3 at 3:17 PMXylem (XYL) Hits a New 52-Week High: What's Driving It?www.zacks.com - July 3 at 8:45 AMETFs with exposure to Xylem, Inc. : June 30, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 1 at 9:19 AMInsider Selling: Xylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Director Sells 66,132 Shares of Stockwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 30 at 7:14 PM$1.17 Billion in Sales Expected for Xylem Inc. (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 30 at 3:20 PMXylem Inc. (XYL) Upgraded to Buy by BidaskClubwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 28 at 3:14 PM$0.56 Earnings Per Share Expected for Xylem Inc. (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 28 at 8:02 AMXylem Inc. (XYL) Research Coverage Started at BMO Capital Marketswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 25 at 8:07 PMHead to Head Contrast: Franklin Electric Co. (FELE) and Xylem (XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 24 at 8:24 PMXylem: Investing In The World's Most Important Commodity - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 22 at 2:54 PMXylem Inc. (XYL) PT Set at $58.00 by Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.www.americanbankingnews.com - June 21 at 11:22 PMNew York High School Students Win 2017 U.S. Stockholm Junior Water Prizefinance.yahoo.com - June 21 at 12:31 AMETFs with exposure to Xylem, Inc. : June 19, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 20 at 9:27 AMXylem (XYL) vs. Flowserve Corporation (FLS) Head-To-Head Contrastwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 19 at 8:23 AMXylem, Inc. :XYL-US: Earnings Analysis: Q1, 2017 By the Numbers : June 16, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 17 at 8:01 AMXylem publishes its 2016 Sustainability Report: Why We Solve Waterfinance.yahoo.com - June 14 at 4:26 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Upgraded by BidaskClub to "Hold"www.americanbankingnews.com - June 10 at 3:38 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Given Consensus Rating of "Buy" by Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 9 at 4:48 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Given "Buy" Rating at Boenning Scattergoodwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 7 at 8:20 AMXylem's (XYL) Future Prospects Encouraging Amid Macro Risksfinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 1:25 AMXylem (XYL) Up 4.4% Since Earnings Report: Can It Continue? - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - June 5 at 9:30 AMXylem (XYL) Up 4.4% Since Earnings Report: Can It Continue?finance.yahoo.com - June 5 at 9:30 AM$1.17 Billion in Sales Expected for Xylem Inc (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 4 at 10:32 AM$0.56 EPS Expected for Xylem Inc (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 2 at 9:50 AMXylem Honored for Engaging Colleagues in Service Around the ... - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - June 2 at 7:56 AMXylem Honored for Engaging Colleagues in Service Around the Globefinance.yahoo.com - June 2 at 7:56 AMXylem affirms its strong support for the Paris Climate Agreementfinance.yahoo.com - June 2 at 7:56 AMXylem Inc (XYL) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Stifel Nicolauswww.americanbankingnews.com - May 27 at 11:30 AMXylem, Inc. : XYL-US: Dividend Analysis : May 25th, 2017 (record date) : By the numbers : May 24, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 25 at 8:08 AMXylem (XYL) Presents At Electrical Products Group 2017 Annual Spring Conference - Slideshowseekingalpha.com - May 23 at 8:12 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Earns Buy Rating from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.www.americanbankingnews.com - May 23 at 8:04 PMXylem Inc. (XYL) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for May 23, 2017 - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - May 23 at 8:03 AMInteresting XYL Put And Call Options For January 2018www.nasdaq.com - May 22 at 7:48 PMCORRECTING and REPLACING Xylem Inc. to present at the Electrical Products Group (EPG) 2017 Annual Spring ... - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - May 17 at 8:09 AMXylem Highlights Practical Solutions to Increase Resilience of the World’s Cities in New Publicationfinance.yahoo.com - May 17 at 12:15 AMCORRECTING and REPLACING Xylem Inc. to present at the Electrical Products Group (EPG) 2017 Annual Spring Conferencefinance.yahoo.com - May 17 at 12:15 AM


Social





Chart
Xylem (XYL) Chart for Wednesday, July, 26, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/26/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff












































﻿

























Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) Stake Held by Bluestein R H & Co. - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Roper Technologies Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Roper Technologies Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Hill International, Inc. (NYSE:HIL) Downgraded to “Sell” at ValuEngine
aTyr Pharma, Inc. (NASDAQ:LIFE) Upgraded to “Hold” by ValuEngine
Pier 1 Imports, Inc. (PIR) Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research
First Trust Advisors LP Takes Position in Gogo Inc. (NASDAQ:GOGO)
OFG Bancorp (OFG) Position Increased by Bank of New York Mellon Corp
27,266 Shares in Vitamin Shoppe, Inc (NYSE:VSI) Acquired by First Trust Advisors LP
Bank of New York Mellon Corp Has $8.53 Million Stake in Gerdau S.A. (GGB)
UnitedHealth Group Incorporated (NYSE:UNH) Shares Sold by FUKOKU MUTUAL LIFE INSURANCE Co
Farmers Capital Bank Corporation (NASDAQ:FFKT) Position Boosted by First Trust Advisors LP
Quality Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:QSII) Position Boosted by Bank of New York Mellon Corp
Moody Lynn & Lieberson LLC Has $12.33 Million Position in Celgene Corporation (NASDAQ:CELG)
Great West Life Assurance Co. Can Has $140,000 Stake in TFS Financial Corporation (TFSL)
State Board of Administration of Florida Retirement System Has $414,000 Stake in Univest Corporation of Pennsylvania (UVSP)
Brokerages Set Group 1 Automotive, Inc. (GPI) PT at $65.50
Analysts Expect voxeljet AG (VJET) to Post -$0.09 EPS
Brokerages Set Radius Health, Inc. (RDUS) Target Price at $54.20
American National Insurance Co. TX Holds Stake in Boeing Company (The) (BA)
Union Pacific Corporation (UNP) Position Raised by ING Groep NV
Tyers Asset Management LLC Increases Stake in Comcast Corporation (CMCSA)
TerraForm Power, Inc. (TERP) Stake Maintained by State Board of Administration of Florida Retirement System


 


Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) Stake Held by Bluestein R H & Co.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 13th, 2017 // No Comments 

Bluestein R H & Co. held its stake in shares of Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 1,500 shares of the industrial products company’s stock at the end of the first quarter. Bluestein R H & Co.’s holdings in Roper Technologies were worth $310,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also modified their holdings of the company. Seven Eight Capital LP acquired a new position in shares of Roper Technologies during the fourth quarter worth approximately $1,391,000. GLG LLC increased its position in Roper Technologies by 6.8% in the fourth quarter. GLG LLC now owns 5,478 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $1,003,000 after buying an additional 348 shares in the last quarter. Loomis Sayles & Co. L P increased its position in Roper Technologies by 12.1% in the fourth quarter. Loomis Sayles & Co. L P now owns 506,779 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $92,781,000 after buying an additional 54,802 shares in the last quarter. First Republic Investment Management Inc. increased its position in Roper Technologies by 14.2% in the fourth quarter. First Republic Investment Management Inc. now owns 119,856 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $21,943,000 after buying an additional 14,929 shares in the last quarter. Finally, Silvercrest Asset Management Group LLC increased its position in Roper Technologies by 3.1% in the fourth quarter. Silvercrest Asset Management Group LLC now owns 1,396 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $256,000 after buying an additional 42 shares in the last quarter. 96.73% of the stock is owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Roper Technologies Inc. alerts:



Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE ROP) traded up 1.02% during trading on Wednesday, reaching $237.66. The company’s stock had a trading volume of 394,595 shares. The company’s 50 day moving average price is $227.90 and its 200 day moving average price is $208.27. The company has a market cap of $24.25 billion, a P/E ratio of 36.68 and a beta of 1.05. Roper Technologies, Inc. has a 52 week low of $159.28 and a 52 week high of $238.49. 




Roper Technologies (NYSE:ROP) last announced its quarterly earnings results on Friday, April 28th. The industrial products company reported $2.11 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $1.99 by $0.12. Roper Technologies had a net margin of 16.74% and a return on equity of 12.81%. The company had revenue of $1.09 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $1.09 billion. During the same quarter in the previous year, the business posted $1.81 earnings per share. Roper Technologies’s quarterly revenue was up 20.4% on a year-over-year basis. On average, equities analysts anticipate that Roper Technologies, Inc. will post $9.21 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The firm also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Friday, July 21st. Investors of record on Friday, July 7th will be given a $0.35 dividend. This represents a $1.40 annualized dividend and a yield of 0.59%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 5th. Roper Technologies’s dividend payout ratio is presently 21.60%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: “Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) Stake Held by Bluestein R H & Co.” was first posted by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are reading this report on another domain, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. and international trademark & copyright laws. The original version of this report can be read at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/13/bluestein-r-h-co-maintains-position-in-roper-technologies-inc-rop-updated.html. 
A number of brokerages have recently weighed in on ROP. Cowen and Company reaffirmed an “outperform” rating and set a $250.00 price target (up from $220.00) on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Monday, April 17th. Royal Bank Of Canada reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $245.00 price target on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Tuesday, April 11th. J P Morgan Chase & Co lowered Roper Technologies from an “overweight” rating to a “neutral” rating and set a $219.00 price target for the company. in a research note on Friday, March 24th. Stifel Nicolaus reissued a “buy” rating and set a $242.00 price objective on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Friday, July 7th. Finally, Zacks Investment Research raised Roper Technologies from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $259.00 price objective for the company in a research note on Tuesday, July 4th. Two equities research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating, eight have issued a buy rating and one has assigned a strong buy rating to the company. The company presently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and a consensus price target of $235.80.
In other news, Director Christopher Wright sold 1,800 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction on Friday, June 9th. The shares were sold at an average price of $228.70, for a total transaction of $411,660.00. Following the completion of the sale, the director now directly owns 66,104 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $15,117,984.80. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through the SEC website. 2.50% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
About Roper Technologies
 

 
Receive News & Ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 

















































Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price - BNB Daily












 
















 

 

Home » Investing



Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about HealthSouth Corp (NYSE:HLS) has trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment Analysis reports. The research group scores the sentiment of news coverage by reviewing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) Given Daily Media Impact Score of 0.27

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Press coverage about Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) has trended positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern identifies negative and positive media coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) Receiving Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) has been trending positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Ford Motor (F) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Study Shows

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media headlines about Ford Motor (NYSE:F) have been trending somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. The research group scores the sentiment of media coverage by monitoring more than 20 million news and blog sources...  




Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) Receives Media Impact Score of 0.14

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News headlines about Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) have trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. The research firm identifies positive and negative media coverage by reviewing more than 20 million blog and...  




Genesis Energy, L.P. (GEL) Given Daily Coverage Optimism Score of 0.07

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Genesis Energy, L.P. (NYSE:GEL) has been trending somewhat positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Favorable News Coverage Likely to Impact GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) Share Price

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) has been trending positive on Thursday, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern ranks the sentiment of news coverage by analyzing more than 20 million news and blog sources. Accern ranks...  




Newmont Mining Corporation (NEM) Upgraded to “Outperform” at Scotiabank

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Newmont Mining Corporation (NYSE:NEM) was upgraded by stock analysts at Scotiabank from a “sector perform” rating to an “outperform” rating in a report released on Wednesday, July 5th. The brokerage presently...  




Kohl’s Corporation (KSS) Upgraded by BidaskClub to Hold

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Kohl’s Corporation (NYSE:KSS) was upgraded by stock analysts at BidaskClub from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Wednesday, July 5th.
A number of other brokerages have...  




Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) Upgraded to “Buy” by Citigroup Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Citigroup Inc. upgraded shares of Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note released on Wednesday, July 5th, MarketBeat.com reports. The brokerage currently has $15.00 price objective...  




AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report issued on Wednesday, July 5th.
According to Zacks, “AG Mortgage...  




Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (ADM) Receives “Hold” Rating from BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (NYSE:ADM)‘s stock had its “hold” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th. They currently have a $41.00 price objective...  




Zacks Investment Research Lowers Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) to Hold

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “GUIDANCE...  




Black Box Corporation (BBOX) Rating Increased to Buy at Sidoti

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sidoti upgraded shares of Black Box Corporation (NASDAQ:BBOX) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. Sidoti currently has $10.00 price objective on the...  




Mizuho Lowers Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) to Neutral

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mizuho downgraded shares of Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) from a buy rating to a neutral rating in a research note published on Tuesday, July 4th, StockTargetPrices.com reports. Mizuho currently has $150.00 price objective...  




Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) Upgraded to “Hold” by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “strong sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “Harmonic designs,...  




Alphabet Inc. (GOOGL) Receives “Buy” Rating from Cantor Fitzgerald

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cantor Fitzgerald restated their buy rating on shares of Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL) in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, Marketbeat Ratings reports. Cantor Fitzgerald currently has a $1,070.00 price objective on the...  




Sysco Corporation’s (SYY) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sysco Corporation (NYSE:SYY)‘s stock had its “buy” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. They currently have a $60.00...  




Somewhat Positive Media Coverage Very Likely to Impact Praxair (PX) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about Praxair (NYSE:PX) has trended somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. Accern identifies negative and positive press coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




LyondellBasell Industries NV (LYB) Given Consensus Rating of “Hold” by Analysts

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Shares of LyondellBasell Industries NV (NYSE:LYB) have received an average recommendation of “Hold” from the twenty-one research firms that are currently covering the firm, Marketbeat Ratings reports. One research analyst...  




Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) Given Consensus Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages

Posted by Renee Johnson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) has been assigned a consensus recommendation of “Buy” from the seven ratings firms that are covering the company, MarketBeat reports. One analyst has rated the stock...  




Rice Energy Inc. (RICE) Rating Lowered to Hold at KLR Group

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

KLR Group lowered shares of Rice Energy Inc. (NYSE:RICE) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research report report published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat reports. They currently have $27.00 price target on the oil and gas...  




$0.39 Earnings Per Share Expected for Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) This Quarter

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Wall Street brokerages forecast that Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) will announce earnings per share of $0.39 for the current quarter, according to Zacks Investment Research. Four analysts have provided estimates for Axalta...  




Eagle Materials Inc (EXP) Expected to Post Earnings of $1.17 Per Share

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Equities analysts expect Eagle Materials Inc (NYSE:EXP) to report earnings of $1.17 per share for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Eagle Materials’ earnings,...  




Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ:MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (ADSW) Head to Head Analysis

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ: MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (NASDAQ:ADSW) are both finance companies, but which is the superior investment? We will contrast the two companies based on the strength of their earnings, dividends,...  




Levin Capital Strategies L.P. Sells 669,521 Shares of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (TMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Levin Capital Strategies L.P. cut its position in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (NYSE:TMO) by 91.5% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 62,473...  




Phillips 66 (PSX) Shares Sold by South State Corp

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

South State Corp cut its position in Phillips 66 (NYSE:PSX) by 19.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 49,006 shares of the oil and gas company’s...  




Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. Sells 7,102 Shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (GS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. decreased its position in shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (NYSE:GS) by 19.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Stake Increased by Blue Chip Partners Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Blue Chip Partners Inc. raised its position in General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) by 3.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 16,110 shares...  




Caterpillar, Inc. (CAT) Position Maintained by Pettee Investors Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Pettee Investors Inc. continued to hold its position in shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 2,332 shares...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.25 Million Stake in Imperial Oil Ltd (IMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC increased its position in shares of Imperial Oil Ltd (NYSEMKT:IMO) (TSE:IMO) by 4.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission...  




Citigroup Inc. (C) Stake Decreased by NEXT Financial Group Inc

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

NEXT Financial Group Inc reduced its position in shares of Citigroup Inc. (NYSE:C) by 31.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 14,080 shares of the financial...  




Essex Financial Services Inc. Has $261,000 Position in FedEx Corporation (FDX)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Essex Financial Services Inc. increased its stake in FedEx Corporation (NYSE:FDX) by 14.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The fund owned 1,335 shares of the shipping service provider’s...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.28 Million Stake in W.R. Grace & Co. (GRA)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of W.R. Grace & Co. (NYSE:GRA) by 30.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)....  




Omnia Family Wealth LLC Maintains Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Omnia Family Wealth LLC continued to hold its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 3,836 shares of...  




Eagle Asset Management Inc. Cuts Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Eagle Asset Management Inc. lowered its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) by 11.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned...  




Warren Averett Asset Management LLC Takes Position in Duke Energy Corporation (DUK)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Warren Averett Asset Management LLC bought a new stake in shares of Duke Energy Corporation (NYSE:DUK) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.33 Million Stake in BancorpSouth, Inc. (BXS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of BancorpSouth, Inc. (NYSE:BXS) by 4.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The...  




HubSpot, Inc. (HUBS) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. increased its position in shares of HubSpot, Inc. (NYSE:HUBS) by 1.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 75,500...  




Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (KLIC) Earns “Buy” Rating from B. Riley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

B. Riley reaffirmed their buy rating on shares of Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (NASDAQ:KLIC) in a report released on Thursday, June 29th. B. Riley currently has a $31.00 price target on the semiconductor company’s stock.
A...  




VCA Inc. (WOOF) Lifted to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VCA Inc. (NASDAQ:WOOF) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th.
According to Zacks, “VCA Inc. is a national animal healthcare...  




Cray Inc (CRAY) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. raised its position in shares of Cray Inc (NASDAQ:CRAY) by 4.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 212,960...  




149,273 Shares in Premier, Inc. (PINC) Acquired by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. acquired a new position in Premier, Inc. (NASDAQ:PINC) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund acquired 149,273 shares of the...  




Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (CY) Raised to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (NASDAQ:CY) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th. The brokerage presently has a $15.00...  




Intertek Group plc (ITRK) Downgraded to Neutral at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Intertek Group plc (LON:ITRK) was downgraded by research analysts at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) to a “neutral” rating in a note issued to investors on Monday, July 3rd, Marketbeat reports. They currently have a GBX...  




Beaufort Securities Downgrades Fox Marble Holdings PLC (FOX) to Hold

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Beaufort Securities downgraded shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) to a hold rating in a research report sent to investors on Monday, July 3rd.
Shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) traded up 0.000% on Monday, hitting...  




VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (VDSI) Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (NASDAQ:VDSI) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report issued to clients and investors on Thursday, June...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Earns “Equal Weight” Rating from Morgan Stanley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Morgan Stanley restated their equal weight rating on shares of General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) in a research report sent to investors on Sunday, June 25th. Morgan Stanley currently has a $55.00 price target on the stock, down from...  




Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL)‘s stock had its “buy” rating restated by analysts at Jefferies Group LLC in a research note issued to investors on Sunday, June 25th. They presently have a $47.00 price objective on the industrial...  




$7.06 Billion in Sales Expected for Philip Morris International Inc (PM) This Quarter

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Brokerages expect Philip Morris International Inc (NYSE:PM) to post $7.06 billion in sales for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Philip Morris International’s...  


Next » 














Free Email Newsletter
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Thermo Fisher Scientific (TMO) Receiving Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Analysis Shows
Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Limited (TEVA) Receives Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.41
PNC Financial Services Group, Inc. (The) (PNC) Position Raised by Delta Lloyd NV
Rogers Corporation (ROG) Position Cut by Prudential Financial Inc.
TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (TJX) Shares Bought by Mason Street Advisors LLC
Becton, Dickinson and Company (BDX) Position Raised by Wealthsource Partners LLC
Nordea Investment Management AB Sells 889,163 Shares of Stryker Corporation (SYK)
Orbotech Ltd. (ORBK) Shares Bought by Envestnet Asset Management Inc.
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Sells 11 Shares of Cubic Corporation (CUB)
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Acquires 2,349 Shares of Vipshop Holdings Limited (VIPS)
Premier Asset Managment LLC Has $369,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN)
Allergan PLC. (AGN) Shares Sold by Mayo Investment Advisers LLC
Select Medical Holdings Corporation (SEM) Shares Bought by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Bemis Company, Inc. (BMS) Shares Sold by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Prudential Financial Inc. Acquires 72 Shares of ESCO Technologies Inc. (ESE)
Prudential Financial Inc. Sells 1,732 Shares of Woodward, Inc. (WWD)
JPMorgan Chase & Co. Acquires 249,725 Shares of Enbridge Energy Management LLC (EEQ)
USS Investment Management Ltd Has $22,858,000 Position in General Dynamics Corporation (GD)
Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN) SVP Sells $29,984.00 in Stock
GTT Communications, Inc. (NYSE:GTT) Expected to Post Earnings of -$0.03 Per Share


 





















Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC) Stock Price, News & Analysis






















    























































































Calgon Carbon Corporation Company Profile (NYSE:CCC)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)
Calgon Carbon Corporation is a manufacturer of activated carbon, with capabilities in ultraviolet (UV) light disinfection. The Company provides purification solutions for drinking water, wastewater, pollution abatement, and a range of industrial and commercial manufacturing processes. The Company operates through four segments: Activated Carbon and Service, Equipment, Consumer and Other. The Company's products and services are designed to protect human health and the environment from harmful contaminants in water, and air. The Company provides purification solutions for drinking water, wastewater, pollution abatement, and a range of industrial and commercial manufacturing processes. The Company operates in the United States, Europe, Japan, Africa, Canada, China, India, Latin America, and in other parts of Asia. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Industrial Products
Industry: Commodity Chemicals - NEC
Sub-Industry: Commodity Chemicals
Symbol: NYSE:CCC
CUSIP: 12960310
Web: www.calgoncarbon.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $809.52 millionOutstanding Shares: 50,753,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $15.25200 Day Moving Avg: $14.8752 Week Range: $12.89 - $18.80


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 89.72Foreward P/E Ratio: 19.94P/E Growth: 4.14Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $536.75 millionPrice / Sales: 1.53Book Value: $7.53 per sharePrice / Book: 2.14Dividend:Annual Dividend: $0.20Dividend Yield: 1.3%


Profitability:EBIDTA: $79.84 millionNet Margins: 1.70%Return on Equity: 5.68%Return on Assets: 3.09%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 0.60%Current Ratio: 2.84%Quick Ratio: 1.55%Misc:Average Volume: 335,910 shs.Beta: 1.08Short Ratio: 3.4

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)
What is Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock symbol?

Calgon Carbon Corporation trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "CCC."



How often does Calgon Carbon Corporation pay dividends? What is the dividend yield for Calgon Carbon Corporation?

Calgon Carbon Corporation announced a quarterly dividend on Thursday, May 4th. Shareholders of record on Monday, June 5th will be given a dividend of $0.05 per share on Thursday, June 15th. This represents a $0.20 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 1.24%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Thursday, June 1st.  View Calgon Carbon Corporation's Dividend History.



How were Calgon Carbon Corporation's earnings last quarter?

Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC) announced its quarterly earnings data on Tuesday, May, 9th. The company reported $0.10 EPS for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.09 by $0.01. The business had revenue of $142.70 million for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $143.03 million. Calgon Carbon Corporation had a return on equity of 5.68% and a net margin of 1.70%. The business's revenue for the quarter was up 18.7% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the prior year, the company posted $0.11 EPS.  View Calgon Carbon Corporation's Earnings History.



When will Calgon Carbon Corporation make its next earnings announcement?

Calgon Carbon Corporation is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Friday, August, 4th 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Calgon Carbon Corporation.



Where is Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock going? Where will Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock price be in 2017?

5 brokerages have issued 1-year price targets for Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock. Their forecasts range from $16.00 to $20.00. On average, they anticipate Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock price to reach $17.40 in the next twelve months. View Analyst Ratings for Calgon Carbon Corporation.



Are investors shorting Calgon Carbon Corporation?

Calgon Carbon Corporation saw a increase in short interest in July. As of July 14th, there was short interest totalling 2,007,883 shares,  an increase of 103.8% from the June 30th total of 984,990 shares. Based on an average daily trading volume, of 600,274 shares, the short-interest ratio is presently 3.3 days. Currently, 4.0% of the company's stock are sold short. 



Who are some of Calgon Carbon Corporation's key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Calgon Carbon Corporation include Innophos Holdings (IPHS), Koppers Holdings (KOP), A. Schulman (SHLM), CSW Industrials (CSWI), Westlake Chemical Partners LP (WLKP), Trecora Resources (TREC), UFP Technologies (UFPT), Enzymotec (ENZY), Zotefoams plc (ZTF), Applied Graphene Materials PLC (AGM), Airgas (ARG), Axiall Corp (AXLL) and Axiall Corp (GGC).



Who are Calgon Carbon Corporation's key executives?

Calgon Carbon Corporation's management team includes the folowing people: Randall S. Dearth, Chairman of the Board, President, Chief Executive OfficerRobert Fortwangler, Chief Financial Officer, Senior Vice PresidentJames A. Coccagno, Executive Vice President - Core Carbon and ServicesStevan R. Schott, Executive Vice President - Advanced Materials, Manufacturing, and EquipmentChad Whalen, Senior Vice President, General Counsel, SecretaryTimothy G. Rupert, Lead Independent DirectorJ. Rich Richard Alexander, Independent DirectorWilliam J. Lyons, Independent DirectorLouis S. Massimo, Independent DirectorWilliam R. Newlin, Independent Director



Who owns Calgon Carbon Corporation stock?

Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock is owned by many different of institutional and retail investors. Top institutional shareholders include BTIM Corp. (1.08%), Rockefeller Financial Services Inc. (0.08%), US Bancorp DE (0.07%), Louisiana State Employees Retirement System (0.04%), Catawba Capital Management VA (0.03%) and Eqis Capital Management Inc. (0.03%). Company insiders that own Calgon Carbon Corporation stock include J Rich Alexander, James Andrew Coccagno, Louis S Massimo, Randall S Dearth, Stevan R Schott and William R Newlin. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Calgon Carbon Corporation.



Who sold Calgon Carbon Corporation stock? Who is selling Calgon Carbon Corporation stock?

Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including BTIM Corp. and US Bancorp DE. Company insiders that have sold Calgon Carbon Corporation stock in the last year include J Rich Alexander and William R Newlin. View Insider Buying and Selling for Calgon Carbon Corporation.



Who bought Calgon Carbon Corporation stock? Who is buying Calgon Carbon Corporation stock?

Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock was bought by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Rockefeller Financial Services Inc., State of Alaska Department of Revenue, Eqis Capital Management Inc. and Louisiana State Employees Retirement System. Company insiders that have bought Calgon Carbon Corporation stock in the last two years include James Andrew Coccagno, Louis S Massimo, Randall S Dearth and Stevan R Schott. View Insider Buying and Selling for Calgon Carbon Corporation.



How do I buy Calgon Carbon Corporation stock? 

Shares of Calgon Carbon Corporation can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Calgon Carbon Corporation's stock price today?

One share of Calgon Carbon Corporation stock can currently be purchased for approximately $16.15.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE CCC)Community Ranking:  2.1 out of 5 ( )Outperform Votes:  87 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  124 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  211MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Calgon Carbon Corporation and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 2 Hold Ratings, 3 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Buy (Score: 2.60)Consensus Price Target: $17.40 (7.74% upside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/13/2017Janney Montgomery ScottDowngradeBuy -> Neutral$18.00 -> $16.00High7/12/2017SidotiReiterated RatingBuy$18.00 -> $20.00Medium4/1/2017Roth CapitalSet Price TargetHold$16.00High2/27/2017Robert W. BairdReiterated RatingOutperform$19.00N/A8/8/2016Avondale PartnersUpgradeMarket Perform -> Outperform$16.00N/A6/1/2016Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.Initiated CoverageOutperformN/A5/9/2016WedbushLower Price TargetNeutral$17.00 -> $15.00N/A2/22/2016BB&T CorporationDowngradeBuy -> HoldN/A2/6/2016Bank of America CorporationReiterated RatingUnderperform$10.00 -> $8.00N/A(Data available from 7/26/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)Earnings History by Quarter for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE CCC)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails8/3/2017$0.14N/A5/9/2017Q1 2017$0.09$0.10$143.03 million$142.70 millionViewListen2/24/2017Q4 2016$0.16($0.12)$142.40 million$137.50 millionViewN/A11/3/2016Q316$0.14$0.13$127.46 million$124.00 millionViewListen8/5/2016Q216$0.17$0.15$130.07 million$132.60 millionViewListen5/5/2016Q116$0.16$0.11$126.07 million$120.20 millionViewListen2/19/2016Q415$0.16$0.15$129.45 million$130.90 millionViewListen11/5/2015Q315$0.25$0.23$141.31 million$133.00 millionViewListen8/6/2015Q215$0.26$0.24$145.36 million$135.45 millionViewListen5/7/2015Q115$0.21$0.21$136.49 million$135.70 millionViewListen2/19/2015Q414$0.23$0.23$104.47 million$140.60 millionViewListen11/5/2014Q314$0.24$0.23$142.40 million$137.70 millionViewListen8/8/2014Q214$0.29$0.28$147.60 million$145.10 millionViewListen5/8/2014Q114$0.18$0.18$132.45 million$131.60 millionViewListen2/19/2014Q413$0.20$0.20$138.23 million$133.10 millionViewListen11/5/2013Q313$0.22$0.22$140.14 million$139.40 millionViewListen8/6/2013Q2 2013$0.21$0.24$142.73 million$140.40 millionViewListen5/6/2013Q1 2013$0.15$0.18$138.64 million$135.00 millionViewListen2/21/2013Q4 2012$0.14$0.16$141.86 million$141.80 millionViewN/A11/2/2012Q312$0.11($0.08)$139.63 million$135.40 millionViewN/A8/8/2012$0.19$0.19ViewN/A5/1/2012$0.12$0.14ViewN/A11/3/2011$0.22$0.25ViewN/A8/2/2011$0.21$0.20ViewN/A5/3/2011$0.17$0.15ViewN/A2/23/2011$0.17$0.22ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $0.61QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20171$0.06$0.06$0.06Q2 20172$0.14$0.19$0.17Q3 20172$0.19$0.20$0.20Q4 20172$0.19$0.19$0.19(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)Most Recent Dividend:6/15/2017Annual Dividend:$0.20Dividend Yield:1.24%Dividend Growth:0.00% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:111.11% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  34.48% (Based on This Year's Estimates)24.69% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Dividend History by Quarter for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE CCC)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date5/4/2017quarterly$0.051.43%6/1/20176/5/20176/15/20172/16/2017quarterly$0.051.22%3/2/20173/6/20173/15/201711/7/2016quarterly$0.051.35%12/1/201612/5/201612/15/20168/5/2016quarterly$0.051.48%8/31/20169/2/20169/15/20165/6/2016quarterly$0.051.32%6/2/20166/6/20166/15/20162/19/2016quarterly$0.051.25%3/2/20163/4/20163/15/201611/5/2015quarterly$0.051.29%12/2/201512/4/201512/15/20158/6/2015quarterly$0.051.29%9/2/20159/4/20159/15/20155/7/2015quarterly$0.050.92%6/3/20156/5/20156/15/20152/19/2015quarterly$0.050.96%3/3/20153/5/20153/15/2015(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)Insider Ownership Percentage: 2.32%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 82.51%Insider Trades by Quarter for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails5/30/2017J Rich AlexanderDirectorSell5,251$14.25$74,826.75  11/9/2016William R NewlinDirectorSell34,014$14.98$509,529.72  11/18/2015Louis S. MassimoDirectorBuy9,743$15.28$148,873.04  11/17/2015Louis S. MassimoDirectorBuy257$15.00$3,855.00  8/24/2015James Andrew CoccagnoSVPBuy1,600$15.00$24,000.00  8/20/2015Randall S DearthCEOBuy2,539$15.78$40,065.42  8/17/2015Stevan R SchottCFOBuy5,650$16.24$91,756.00  5/22/2015Randall S DearthCEOSell2,000$21.21$42,420.00  5/13/2015Timothy G RupertDirectorBuy5,000$21.18$105,900.00  12/5/2014Brien Robert P OCOOSell37,917$20.63$782,227.71  12/4/2014Louis S MassimoDirectorBuy10,000$20.75$207,500.00  5/27/2014J Rich AlexanderDirectorSell6,500$21.64$140,660.00  5/21/2014Donald TemplinDirectorBuy2,500$20.80$52,000.00  5/14/2014William LyonsDirectorBuy3,500$21.42$74,970.00  3/19/2014Gail GeronoVPSell5,000$20.65$103,250.00  3/10/2014Julie RobertsDirectorSell7,911$21.00$166,131.00  11/13/2013Brien Robert OCOOSell25,259$20.31$513,010.29  5/28/2013Gail A GeronoVPSell38,185$18.17$693,821.45  5/17/2013William J LyonsDirectorBuy4,165$17.90$74,553.50  5/13/2013Louis S MassimoDirectorBuy9,000$17.25$155,250.00  5/10/2013Donald C TemplinDirectorBuy5,500$17.33$95,315.00  3/22/2013James A SullivanSVPSell23,918$18.23$436,025.14  11/29/2012Richard D RoseSVPBuy1,000$13.04$13,040.00  9/7/2012William R NewlinDirectorBuy3,526$14.06$49,575.56  9/4/2012William R NewlinDirectorBuy8,864$13.50$119,664.00  8/31/2012William R NewlinDirectorBuy2,896$13.63$39,472.48  8/30/2012William J LyonsDirectorBuy4,196$13.69$57,443.24  8/29/2012Randall S DearthCEOBuy2,986$13.39$39,982.54  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)


Latest Headlines for Calgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineCalgon Carbon Schedules Second Quarter 2017 Results Conference Call and Webcastfinance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 6:39 PMCalgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC) Downgraded to "Sell" at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 17 at 4:04 PMCalgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC) Given Average Rating of "Buy" by Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 9:18 AMCalgon Carbon Says Disappointment With IMO Amendmentwww.nasdaq.com - July 13 at 11:01 PMCalgon Carbon Responds to Recently Approved Amendment to the 2004 International Ballast Water Management Convention Implementation Schedulefinance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 6:00 PMCalgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Downgraded by Janney Montgomery Scott to Neutralwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 13 at 4:10 PMNoble Up Because Of Goldilocks While HSBC Palm Oil Policy Drives RSPO Inquiryseekingalpha.com - July 12 at 10:43 PM30 Under 30 award winner: Jennifer DeCarowww.bizjournals.com - July 12 at 10:43 PMCalgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Earns Buy Rating from Sidotiwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 12 at 10:36 AMCalgon Carbon Corporation (NYSE:CCC) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 11 at 9:38 PMETFs with exposure to Calgon Carbon Corp. : July 7, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 8 at 9:34 AM Analysts Expect Calgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Will Announce Quarterly Sales of $153.90 Millionwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 29 at 8:58 AM Analysts Expect Calgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Will Announce Earnings of $0.14 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - June 28 at 12:30 AMCalgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Forecasted to Post Q2 2017 Earnings of $0.14 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - June 26 at 7:08 AMCalgon Carbon Corp. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bearish Manner : CCC-US : June 22, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 22 at 11:20 AMCalgon Carbon Corp. :CCC-US: Earnings Analysis: Q1, 2017 By the Numbers : June 21, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 21 at 5:17 PMCalgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Given Consensus Recommendation of "Buy" by Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 19 at 7:58 AMCalgon Carbon (CCC) Up 5% Since Earnings Report: Can It Continue?finance.yahoo.com - June 14 at 4:57 PMComparing Federal Signal (FSS) and Calgon Carbon (CCC)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 8 at 7:54 AMCalgon Carbon (CCC) vs. Clean Diesel Technologies (CDTI) Head-To-Head Surveywww.americanbankingnews.com - June 7 at 6:18 PMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Receives New Coverage from Analysts at Sidotiwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 7 at 4:14 PMCalgon Carbon Awarded 2.9 Million Pound Granular Activated Carbon (GAC) Water Treatment Contract for Choa Chu Kang (CCK) Waterworks Facility in Singaporefinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 1:23 PMCalgon Carbon Signs Water Treatment Contract in Singaporefinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 1:23 PMCalgon Carbon Signs Water Treatment Contracts Valued at $3.5 Million for Removal of PFOSfinance.yahoo.com - June 5 at 12:22 PMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Lifted to Hold at ValuEnginewww.americanbankingnews.com - June 3 at 4:28 PM$153.90 Million in Sales Expected for Calgon Carbon Co. (CCC) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 3 at 7:32 AM$0.13 EPS Expected for Calgon Carbon Co. (CCC) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 1 at 8:20 PMCalgon Carbon Corp. : CCC-US: Dividend Analysis : June 05th, 2017 (record date) : By the numbers : June 1, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 1 at 4:42 PMCalgon Carbon (CCC) Wins $15.4M DPA Title III Program Awardfinance.yahoo.com - May 31 at 4:16 PMJ Rich Alexander Sells 5,251 Shares of Calgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Stockwww.americanbankingnews.com - May 30 at 8:28 PMCalgon Carbon Earns Defense Production Act (DPA) Title III Program Awardfinance.yahoo.com - May 30 at 12:11 PMCalgon Carbon wins $15.4M defense contractfinance.yahoo.com - May 30 at 12:11 PMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Given Average Recommendation of "Buy" by Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - May 23 at 7:26 AMCalgon Carbon Corp. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bullish Manner : CCC-US : May 22, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 22 at 12:42 PMEdited Transcript of CCC earnings conference call or presentation 9-May-17 1:00pm GMTfinance.yahoo.com - May 13 at 4:13 PMCalgon Carbon's (CCC) CEO Randy Dearth on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcriptseekingalpha.com - May 11 at 9:48 PMZacks: Analysts Anticipate Calgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Will Announce Quarterly Sales of $158.53 Millionwww.americanbankingnews.com - May 10 at 10:30 AMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Releases Quarterly  Earnings Results, Misses Estimates By $0.07 EPSwww.americanbankingnews.com - May 9 at 11:24 AMCalgon Carbon Announces First Quarter 2017 Resultsfinance.yahoo.com - May 9 at 8:25 AMCalgon misses 1Q revenue forecastsmarketbeat.com - May 9 at 7:49 AMZacks: Brokerages Anticipate Calgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Will Post Earnings of $0.09 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - May 8 at 4:16 PMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Scheduled to Post Quarterly Earnings on Tuesdaywww.americanbankingnews.com - May 7 at 7:18 AMCalgon Carbon Corp. – Value Analysis (NYSE:CCC) : May 5, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 5 at 9:25 PMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Plans Quarterly Dividend of $0.05www.americanbankingnews.com - May 4 at 10:36 PMFavorable Press Coverage Somewhat Likely to Impact Calgon Carbon (CCC) Stock Pricewww.americanbankingnews.com - May 4 at 6:04 PMCalgon Carbon Corp. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bearish Manner : CCC-US : May 4, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 4 at 4:18 PMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Receives Consensus Rating of "Buy" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - May 4 at 1:33 AMCalgon Carbon Co. (CCC) Upgraded to "Hold" at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - May 1 at 11:04 PMCalgon Carbon (CCC) Earns Daily News Sentiment Score of 0.31www.americanbankingnews.com - May 1 at 2:46 PMSomewhat Negative Press Coverage Likely to Impact Calgon Carbon (CCC) Stock Pricewww.americanbankingnews.com - April 28 at 2:46 PM


Social





Chart
Calgon Carbon Corporation (CCC) Chart for Wednesday, July, 26, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/26/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff


















































						Continental Building Products (CBPX) EPS Estimated At $0.33; Bluestein R H & Company Increased Its Medtronic Plc (MDT) Holding - Norman Observer								

 






















 

























 






















Trending Stock News
Penny Stock News
Market News
Stock News
Contact Us






Continental Building Products (CBPX) EPS Estimated At $0.33; Bluestein R H & Company Increased Its Medtronic Plc (MDT) Holding


					
						July 21, 2017 - By Marguerite Chambers


 Analysts expect Continental Building Products Inc (NYSE:CBPX) to report $0.33 EPS on August, 2.They anticipate $0.02 EPS change or 6.45% from last quarter’s $0.31 EPS. CBPX’s profit would be $12.63 million giving it 16.67 P/E if the $0.33 EPS is correct. After having $0.32 EPS previously, Continental Building Products Inc’s analysts see 3.13% EPS growth. About 75,672 shares traded. Continental Building Products Inc (NYSE:CBPX) has risen 13.56% since July 21, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 3.14% the S&P500.
Bluestein R H & Company increased Medtronic Plc (MDT) stake by 8759.46% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Bluestein R H & Company acquired 258,842 shares as Medtronic Plc (MDT)’s stock rose 5.51%. The Bluestein R H & Company holds 261,797 shares with $18.65 million value, up from 2,955 last quarter. Medtronic Plc now has $116.43 billion valuation. The stock declined 0.30% or $0.26 reaching $85.41 on the news. About 1.22M shares traded. Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) has risen 4.04% since July 21, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 12.66% the S&P500.






Bluestein R H & Company decreased American Elec Power (NYSE:AEP) stake by 8,450 shares to 6,300 valued at $397,000 in 2016Q4. It also reduced Sherwin Williams Co (NYSE:SHW) stake by 1,947 shares and now owns 123,751 shares. Berkshire Hathaway Cl B (BRKB) was reduced too. 
Among 27 analysts covering Medtronic (NYSE:MDT), 18 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 9 Hold. Therefore 67% are positive. Medtronic had 48 analyst reports since August 10, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. The stock has “Buy” rating by Oppenheimer on Monday, June 26. Barclays Capital maintained Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) rating on Wednesday, November 23. Barclays Capital has “Overweight” rating and $85 target. The firm earned “Buy” rating on Wednesday, November 23 by Needham. JP Morgan downgraded Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) on Tuesday, January 3 to “Neutral” rating. BMO Capital Markets maintained the shares of MDT in report on Wednesday, November 23 with “Outperform” rating. The stock of Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) has “Outperform” rating given on Thursday, July 6 by William Blair. The stock of Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) has “Buy” rating given on Friday, May 26 by Oppenheimer. On Friday, November 13 the stock rating was upgraded by Goldman Sachs to “Conviction Buy List”. As per Tuesday, June 7, the company rating was maintained by Needham. The firm has “Hold” rating given on Friday, April 21 by Northland Capital.
Investors sentiment increased to 0.81 in 2016 Q4. Its up 0.08, from 0.73 in 2016Q3. It increased, as 115 investors sold MDT shares while 468 reduced holdings. 123 funds opened positions while 351 raised stakes. 1.09 billion shares or 8.84% more from 999.44 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. The Colorado-based Advsrs Asset has invested 0.3% in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Illinois-based Lsv Asset Management has invested 0% in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Moreover, Central Securities Corporation has 3.55% invested in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) for 250,000 shares. Riverhead Cap Mngmt Limited Liability Corporation reported 0.03% in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Corbyn Invest Inc Md holds 0.98% or 46,100 shares in its portfolio. Letko Brosseau Assocs Inc has 419,910 shares. National Insur Company Tx stated it has 76,813 shares or 0.32% of all its holdings. The Texas-based Cadence Retail Bank Na has invested 0.15% in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Marshall Wace Llp has 32,309 shares for 0.02% of their portfolio. Moreover, Agf Investments Inc has 0.01% invested in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Davis R M Inc reported 406,918 shares stake. Atlanta Cap stated it has 0.05% of its portfolio in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Hancock Communications holds 0.09% of its portfolio in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT) for 32,576 shares. Canada Pension Plan Invest Board has invested 0.1% in Medtronic plc. Ordinary Shares (NYSE:MDT). Tarbox Gru invested in 5,160 shares or 0.21% of the stock.
Among 8 analysts covering Continental Building Products (NYSE:CBPX), 3 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 5 Hold. Therefore 38% are positive. Continental Building Products had 19 analyst reports since August 23, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. On Monday, May 16 the stock rating was maintained by Deutsche Bank with “Hold”. The rating was initiated by Barclays Capital on Friday, January 6 with “Equal Weight”. The firm has “Neutral” rating by Citigroup given on Thursday, August 4. The firm has “Hold” rating by BB&T Capital given on Monday, October 12. The stock has “Buy” rating by RBC Capital Markets on Monday, June 19. The stock has “Neutral” rating by Seaport Global Securities on Tuesday, November 22. The firm has “Outperform” rating by RBC Capital Markets given on Monday, November 2. RBC Capital Markets maintained Continental Building Products Inc (NYSE:CBPX) on Tuesday, February 23 with “Outperform” rating. The firm has “Outperform” rating given on Wednesday, May 11 by RBC Capital Markets. The firm earned “Overweight” rating on Thursday, June 2 by Barclays Capital.
Continental Building Products, Inc. is a maker of gypsum wallboard and complementary finishing products. The company has market cap of $841.91 million. The Firm operates through wallboard segment. It has a 20.2 P/E ratio. Gypsum wallboard is a primary building material used in residential and commercial construction and in repair and remodel .



Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our daily email newsletter.












 




Free Email Newsletter Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:






  Recent Posts 

Yhb Investment Advisors Has Increased By $468,165 Its Johnson & Johnson (JNJ) Stake; Generation Investment Management Llp Has Increased By $177.00 Million Its Cooper Cos (COO) Position


58.com (ADR) (WUBA) Reaches $51.25 After 9.00% Up Move, Bofi Holding (BOFI) Shorts Lowered By 0.54%


EPS for CARDIOME PHARMA (CRME) Expected At $-0.18; Cantab Capital Partners Llp Increased By $413,168 Its Microsoft Cmn (MSFT) Holding


Bellecapital International LTD Has Lifted By $599,949 Its Amazon Com (AMZN) Stake, Incline Global Management Has Decreased Sunoco LP (SUN) Position By $575,328


Apollo Global Management (APO) Reaches $28.46 52-Week High, Baillie Gifford & Company Has Trimmed By $1.81 Million Its Pricesmart (PSMT) Position


Caladrius Biosciences (CLBS) Analysts See $-0.96 EPS, Beneficial Bancorp (BNCL) Shorts Decreased By 6.2%


$0.46 EPS Expected for Community Healthcare Trust (CHCT); Super Micro Computer Has 1.19 Sentiment


Suncoast Equity Management Increased Bard C R (BCR) Holding By $3.35 Million; BRITANNIA MINING (BMIN) Shorts Decreased By 99%


Analysts See $-0.24 EPS for BioDelivery Sciences International, Inc. (BDSI), BINGO NATION (BLTO) SI Decreased By 39.6%


Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Decreased Aes (AES) Position By $390,291, Peapack Gladstone Financial Lifted Its Procter & Gamble Co (PG) Holding






© Copyright 2011-2017 Norman Observer
				
			

		












            	Get the Next Big Winner in your inbox Before the Bell



            
Lists*Consumer Eagle

























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v



























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          













bluestein r h & co - WOW.com - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation

















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images




Reference


Reference










Bluestein Name Meaning - Origins, Family History & More



Ad
 ·
www.myheritage.com/​Bluestein



Find more Bluestein information & records on MyHeritage - Easy & Free!





Smith



Williams



Brown




Johnson



Jones



Davis





Bluestein - We have it on Search.com | search.com



Ad
 ·
www.search.com/​Bluestein/​Search no more



Bluestein Results for your search. See yourself.





All That You Need



Your Finances Up To Date




Straight Accounting



Difficult Finances





Hidden County Records Search - Enter A Name Search For Free



Ad
 ·
www.publicrecordsOfficial.com



See Anyone's Hidden County Records. Enter a Name & Search For Free!





Driving Records



Court Records



Public Records



Search Public Records





Searches related tobluestein r h & co



robert bluestein


rhbco


rh and co



blustein


bluestein and associates


rh company




Web Results

R.H. Bluestein and Company ... - Investment Managers

https://www.rhbco.com


Investment Managers and Advisors Our company. R.H. Bluestein & Company is comprised of experienced professionals dedicated to the goal of achieving superior ...



Client Login



Who We Are



Bluestein R H & Co. Maintains Position in Dril-Quip, Inc ...

https://www.watchlistnews.com/bluestein-r-h-co-maintains-position...


Bluestein R H & Co. continued to hold its stake in shares of Dril-Quip, Inc. (NYSE:DRQ) during the first quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The institutional investor ...


Bluestein R H & Co. Maintains Stake in Roper Technologies ...

https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/02/bluestein-r-h-co...


Bluestein R H & Co. held its position in shares of Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the ...


Bluestein R H & Co. Sells 432 Shares of Johnson Controls ...

https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/06/14/bluestein-r-h-co-sells...


Bluestein R H & Co. reduced its stake in shares of Johnson Controls International PLC (NYSE:JCI) by 8.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F ...


R H Bluestein & CO - Investment Advisor - Birmingham, Michigan

investment-advisors.credio.com/l/25115


Find details on R H Bluestein & CO in Birmingham, Michigan. View assets, client details, advisory activities, registration status, disclosures and more.


Bluestein R H & Co. Maintains Position in CNH Industrial ...

https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/06/09/bluestein-r-h-co...


Bluestein R H & Co. continued to hold its stake in CNH Industrial NV (NASDAQ:CNHI) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the ...


Bluestein R H & Co. Continues to Hold Position in BT Group ...

https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/06/12/bluestein-r-h-co...


Bluestein R H & Co. held its stake in shares of BT Group PLC (NYSE:BT) during the first quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The institutional investor owned 20,000 ...


Bluestein R H & Co. Maintains Position in Roper ...

https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/bluestein-r-h-co-maintains...


Bluestein R H & Co. maintained its position in shares of Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing


R.H. Bluestein & Company: Private Company Information ...

www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/snapshot.asp?privcapId=...


R.H. Bluestein & Company company research & investing information. Find executives and the latest company news.










Bluestein Name Meaning - Origins, Family History & More



Ad
 ·
www.myheritage.com/​Bluestein



Find more Bluestein information & records on MyHeritage - Easy & Free!





Smith



Williams



Brown




Johnson



Jones



Davis





Bluestein - We have it on Search.com | search.com



Ad
 ·
www.search.com/​Bluestein/​Search no more



Bluestein Results for your search. See yourself.





All That You Need



Your Finances Up To Date




Straight Accounting



Difficult Finances





Hidden County Records Search - Enter A Name Search For Free



Ad
 ·
www.publicrecordsOfficial.com



See Anyone's Hidden County Records. Enter a Name & Search For Free!





Driving Records



Court Records



Public Records



Search Public Records




Searches related tobluestein r h & co



robert bluestein


rhbco


rh and co



blustein


bluestein and associates


rh company




12345Next






Answers







Howard Bluestein



VORTEX Bluestein is noted for his co-invention of TOTO, with Al Bedard and Carl Ramzy of NOAA, a tornado measuring device that inspired the fictional...

more






Susan Bluestein



Susan Davis (née Bluestein; born May 27, 1946) is an American casting director and the widow of actor Brad Davis. Biography Born in Manhattan and...

more






Abe Bluestein



Abe Bluestein, (1909 – December 3, 1997) was an American anarchist. Like many anarchists born in the early 20th century, Abe came from a radical,...

more










News Results






DGAP-Adhoc: H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA: Vorl [...]



Aktien Check News

 - Jul 20


H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA: Vorläufige Geschäftszahlen für das 1. Halbjahr 2017 ^ DGAP-Ad-hoc: H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA / Schlagwort(e): Vorläufiges...

more





DGAP-Adhoc: H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA: Preliminary...



Dresdner Neueste Nachrichten...

 - Jul 20


- Operating income (EBITDA) at a high level of EUR52.9 million - All three segments made positive contributions to EBITDA - Biggest increase in the...

more





DGAP-Adhoc: H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA: Vorläufige...



Nachrichten Ticker -...

 - Jul 20


H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA: Vorläufige Geschäftszahlen für das 1. Halbjahr 2017 DGAP-Ad-hoc: H&R GmbH & Co. KGaA / Schlagwort(e): Vorläufiges...

more


















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | About our Ads
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Part of the AOL Search Network.












R.H. Bluestein and Company Investment Managers and Advisors
















			RH Bluestein
		







 



Investment Managers and Advisors
Our company
R.H. Bluestein & Company is comprised of experienced professionals dedicated to the goal of achieving superior investment results by emphasizing both preservation of capital and long-term growth.



INQUIRIES:

R.H. Bluestein & Company  -  260 E. Brown Street, Suite 100 Birmingham, MI 48009  (248) 646-4000   inquiries@rhbco.com 
R.H. Bluestein & Company  -  712 Fifth Avenue, 8th Floor, New York, NY 10019  (212) 974-2200   inquiries@rhbco.com 






Our approach 
We allocate equity and fixed income securities in a fashion which reflects the specific needs of each client. 




CONSISTENCY

Paramount to our approach to managing financial assets is our enduring and unwavering commitment to wealth preservation through all market conditions. Our message to our clients is consistent in all environments and the trusted individuals delivering this message have remained largely the same for decades.

Read More
Read Less




DISCIPLINE

We abide by certain time-tested rules in the management of financial assets. This conservative approach has proven, time and again, to protect our clients' assets while, at the same time, providing rewarding long term investment results. 

Read More
Read Less




COMMITMENT

The firm is a family-owned business that works closely with multiple generations of special families. Our commitment to these families is tangible and our influence in their lives is long-lasting. Clients hire us because they sense we will protect them, and retain us because we do.

Read More
Read Less











 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.


















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


